Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-7462
Violations; penalty.

Any person who knowingly and intentionally engages in wholesale drug distribution in this state in violation of the Wholesale Drug Distributor Licensing Act is guilty of a Class III felony.

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 36.